Arkansas, session 2025, SB621.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 23-99-1404 is amended to read as follows:
23-99-1404. Healthcare contract — Good-faith cooperation.
(a) A healthcare insurer shall cooperate in good faith with a
temporary hospital facility in timely executing a healthcare contract.
(b)(1) A healthcare insurer shall cooperate in good faith as required
in under subsection (a) of this section by timely offering a healthcare
contract to a temporary hospital facility no later than thirty (30) days
following a demand for a healthcare contract by the temporary hospital
facility a healthcare contract that is.
*ANS426*
04/03/2025 12:14:42 PM ANS426

SB621
(2) A healthcare contract under subdivision (b)(1) of this
section shall be reflective of the healthcare insurer's standard and
reasonable terms and conditions, including without limitation rates of
reimbursement.
(c) A healthcare contract shall be effective as of the date the
temporary hospital facility is licensed as a hospital by the Department of
Health.
(d) The time period for a healthcare insurer to respond as stated in §
23-99-411 does not apply if the request for a healthcare contract is made by
a temporary hospital facility.
(e)(1) A healthcare insurer shall reimburse a temporary hospital
facility at a rate equal to the rate of a regularly-licensed hospital.
(2) Subdivision (e)(1) of this section applies retroactively to
the date ambulatory surgery center or other healthcare facility became a
temporary hospital facility.
(f) Except as provided under § 23-99-1406(b)(2), all remedies,
penalties, and authority granted to the Insurance Commissioner under the
Trade Practices Act, § 23-66-201 et seq., including the award of restitution
and damages, shall be available to the commissioner for the enforcement of
this subchapter.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 23-99-1406 is amended to read as follows:
23-99-1406. Applicability.
(a) This subchapter shall apply:
(1) Retroactively to the date of issuance of the Governor's
Executive Order 20-06; and
(2) to To any future public health emergencies if the Centers
for Medicare & Medicaid Services and the Department of Health have
implemented similar programs as described in § 23-99-1402(a)(2).
(b)(1) The Insurance Commissioner shall enforce this subchapter.
(2) The commissioner shall not waive any provision of this
subchapter.

SECTION 3. DO NOT CODIFY. Severability clause.
If any provision of this act or the application of this act to any
person or circumstances is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect
04/03/2025 12:14:42 PM ANS426

SB621
other provisions or applications of this act which can be given effect
without the invalid provision of application, and to this end, the provisions
of this act are declared severable.

SECTION 4. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the absence of adequate
statutory enforcement of § 23-99-1404 has resulted in arbitrary reimbursement
practices for temporary hospital facilities; that temporary hospital
facilities are not receiving adequate reimbursement; and that this act is
immediately necessary to clarify Arkansas law to require the Insurance
Commissioner to enforce this act retroactively. Therefore, an emergency is
declared to exist, and this act, being immediately necessary for the
preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall become effective
on:
(1) The date of its approval by the Governor;
(2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,
the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the
bill; or
(3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.
















04/03/2025 12:14:42 PM ANS426